Utah statutes.
19-6-321.   Construction with other state and federal laws -- Governmental immunity.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), nothing in this  part affects or modifies in any way the obligations or liability of any person under a contract or any other provision of this part or state or federal law, including common law, for damages, indemnification, injury, or loss associated with a hazardous material or substance release or a substantial threat of a hazardous material or substance release.

(2)  In addition to the governmental immunity granted in Title 63G, Chapter 7, Governmental Immunity Act of Utah, the state and its political subdivisions are not liable for actions performed under this  part except as a result of intentional misconduct or gross negligence including reckless, willful, or wanton misconduct.

(3)  Nothing in this part affects, limits, or modifies in any way the authority granted to the state, any state agency, or any political subdivision under other state or federal law.

